Washington statutes.
RCW 39.60.040

Insured shares, deposits or accounts as collateral—Partially guaranteed obligations.

The obligations issued pursuant to said Federal Home Loan Bank Act and to said Title IV of the National Housing Act as such acts are now or hereafter amended, and the shares, deposits or accounts of any institution which has the insurance protection provided by Title IV of the National Housing Act, as now or hereafter amended, may be used at face value or withdrawal value, and bonds or other interest bearing obligations as to which the payment of some but less than the full principal and interest is guaranteed by the United States of America or any agency thereof may be used to the extent of the portion so guaranteed, wherever, by statute of this state or otherwise, collateral is required as security for the deposit of funds, or deposits are required to be made with any public official or department, or an investment of capital or surplus, or a reserve or other fund, is required to be maintained consisting of designated security, or wherever by statute of this state or otherwise, any surety, whether personal, corporate, or otherwise, or any collateral or security, is required or permitted for any purpose, including without limitation on the generality of the foregoing, any bond, recognizance, or undertaking.

[ 2016 c 152 s 16; 1967 ex.s. c 48 s 1; 1941 c 249 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3791-2.]